magyarispell/tmp/magyar.aff
a	>	-a,ábbjainkéin +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SUE] D

a	>	-a,ábbjainkéiról +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL] D

a	>	-a,ábbjainkéira +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SBL] D

a	>	-a,ábbjainkéinál +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ADE] D

a	>	-a,ábbjainkéitól +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL] D

a	>	-a,ábbjainkéihoz +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ALL] D

a	>	-a,ábbjainkéiig +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TERM] D

a	>	-a,ábbjainkéivá +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TRANS] D

a	>	-a,ábbjainkéival +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INSTR] D

a	>	-a,ábbjainkéiért +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[CAUS/FIN] D



a	>	-a,ábbjainkéiul +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS] D








a	>	-a,ábbjainkként +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[FORM] D

a	>	-a,ábbjainkkor +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_PL_1]+[TEMP] D





[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bb +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[NOM] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbat +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[ACC] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbnak +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[DAT] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bban +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[INE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bba +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[ILL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bból +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[ELA] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbon +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[SUE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbról +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[DEL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbra +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[SBL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbnál +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[ADE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbtól +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[ABL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbhoz +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[ALL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbig +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[TERM] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbá +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[TRANS] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbal +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[INSTR] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbért +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[CAUS/FIN] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbként +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[FORM] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbé +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[NOM] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbét +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[ACC] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbénak +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[DAT] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbéban +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[INE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbéba +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[ILL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbéból +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[ELA] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbén +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[SUE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbéról +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[DEL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbéra +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[SBL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbénál +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[ADE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbétól +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[ABL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbéhoz +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbéig +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbévá +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[TRANS] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbéval +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[INSTR] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbéért +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[CAUS/FIN] D



[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbéul +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSSESSEE]+[ESS] D




[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbja +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[NOM] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbját +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[ACC] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjának +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[DAT] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjában +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[INE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjába +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[ILL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjából +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[ELA] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbján +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[SUE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáról +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[DEL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjára +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[SBL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjánál +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[ADE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjától +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[ABL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjához +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[ALL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáig +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[TERM] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjává +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[TRANS] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjával +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[INSTR] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáért +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[CAUS/FIN] D



[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjául +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[ESS] D




[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáé +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[NOM] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáét +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ACC] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáénak +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[DAT] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéban +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[INE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéba +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ILL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéból +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ELA] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáén +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[SUE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéról +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[DEL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéra +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[SBL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáénál +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ADE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáétól +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ABL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéhoz +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéig +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáévá +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[TRANS] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéval +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[INSTR] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéért +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[CAUS/FIN] D



[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéul +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ESS] D



 [áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéi +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[NOM]
 
[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéit +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ACC] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéinak +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DAT] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéiban +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéiba +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ILL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéiból +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ELA] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéin +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SUE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéiról +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéira +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SBL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéinál +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ADE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéitól +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéihoz +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ALL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéiig +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TERM] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéivá +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TRANS] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéival +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INSTR] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéiért +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[CAUS/FIN] D



[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjáéiul +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS] D








[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjaként +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[FORM] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjakor +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[POSS_SG_3]+[TEMP] D




[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjai +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[NOM] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjait +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[ACC] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjainak +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[DAT] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjaiban +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[INE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjaiba +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[ILL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjaiból +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[ELA] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjain +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[SUE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjairól +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[DEL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjaira +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[SBL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjainál +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[ADE] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjaitól +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[ABL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjaihoz +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[ALL] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjaiig +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[TERM] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjaivá +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[TRANS] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjaival +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[INSTR] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjaiért +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[CAUS/FIN] D



[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjaiul +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[ESS] D




[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjaié +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[NOM] D

[áéiíóõúû&agrave;&ugrave;&oslash;]	>	bbjaiét +[bb_COMPARATIVE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[POSSESSEE]+[ACC] D
